Maine, session 132, LD1739.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
PART A
Sec. A-1. Authorization of bonds. The Treasurer of State is authorized, under the
direction of the Governor, to issue bonds in the name and on behalf of the State in an
amount not exceeding $55,600,000 for the purposes described in section 5 of this Part. The
bonds are a pledge of the full faith and credit of the State. The bonds may not run for a
period longer than 10 years from the date of the original issue of the bonds.
Sec. A-2. Records of bonds issued; Treasurer of State. The Treasurer of State
shall ensure that an account of each bond is kept showing the number of the bond, the name
of the successful bidder to whom sold, the amount received for the bond, the date of sale
and the date when payable.
Sec. A-3. Sale; how negotiated; proceeds appropriated. The Treasurer of
State may negotiate the sale of the bonds by direction of the Governor, but no bond may
be loaned, pledged or hypothecated on behalf of the State. The proceeds of the sale of the
bonds, which must be held by the Treasurer of State and paid by the Treasurer of State
upon warrants drawn by the State Controller, are appropriated solely for the purposes set
forth in this Part. Any unencumbered balances remaining at the completion of the project
in this Part lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of
general obligation bonds.
Sec. A-4. Interest and debt retirement. The Treasurer of State shall pay interest
due or accruing on any bonds issued under this Part and all sums coming due for payment
of bonds at maturity.
Sec. A-5. Disbursement of bond proceeds from General Fund bond issue.
The proceeds of the sale of the bonds authorized under this Part must be expended as
designated in the following schedule under the direction and supervision of the agencies
and entities set forth in this section.
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY
Maine Agriculture, Food and Forest Products Investment Fund
Provides funds to support the activities of the fund.
Total $25,000,000
3343 Common application
Provides funds to create a common application for all of the department's financial
assistance programs.
Total $600,000
3387 FINANCE AUTHORITY OF MAINE
Dairy Improvement Fund
Provides funds to support the activities of the fund.
Page 1 - 132LR2233(01)

Total $5,000,000
Agricultural Marketing Loan Fund
Provides funds to support the activities of the fund.
Total $5,000,000
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES
Dirigo Business Incentives Program
Provides funds for agriculturally directed spending.
Total $10,000,000
Agricultural Buildings Property Tax Exemption Program
Provides funds to exempt certain agricultural buildings from property taxation for a 10-
year period.
Total $5,000,000
1132 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT
Business Recovery and Resilience Fund
Provides funds for a subaccount for the agricultural sector within the fund.
Total $5,000,000
1176 Sec. A-6. Contingent upon ratification of bond issue. Sections 1 to 5 do not
1187 become effective unless the people of the State ratify the issuance of the bonds as set forth
1198 in this Part.
Sec. A-7. Appropriation balances at year-end. At the end of each fiscal year,
all unencumbered appropriation balances representing state money carry forward. Bond
proceeds that have not been expended within 10 years after the date of the sale of the bonds
lapse to the Office of the Treasurer of State to be used for the retirement of general
obligation bonds.
Sec. A-8. Bonds authorized but not issued. Any bonds authorized but not issued
within 5 years of ratification of this Part are deauthorized and may not be issued, except
that the Legislature may, within 2 years after the expiration of that 5-year period, extend
the period for issuing any remaining unissued bonds for an additional amount of time not
to exceed 5 years.
Sec. A-9. Referendum for ratification; submission at election; form of
question; effective date. This Part must be submitted to the legal voters of the State at
a statewide election held in the month of November following passage of this Act. The
municipal officers of this State shall notify the inhabitants of their respective cities, towns
and plantations to meet, in the manner prescribed by law for holding a statewide election,
to vote on the acceptance or rejection of this Part by voting on the following question:
"Do you favor a $55,600,000 bond issue to support the agricultural sector
in Maine?"
The legal voters of each city, town and plantation shall vote by ballot on this question
and designate their choice by a cross or check mark placed within a corresponding square
Page 2 - 132LR2233(01)

410 below the word "Yes" or "No." The ballots must be received, sorted, counted and declared
421 in open ward, town and plantation meetings and returns made to the Secretary of State in
432 the same manner as votes for members of the Legislature. The Governor shall review the
443 returns. If a majority of the legal votes are cast in favor of this Part, the Governor shall
454 proclaim the result without delay and this Part becomes effective 30 days after the date of
465 the proclamation.
The Secretary of State shall prepare and furnish to each city, town and plantation all
ballots, returns and copies of this Part necessary to carry out the purposes of this
referendum.
PART B
Sec. B-1. 36 MRSA §1122 is enacted to read:
§1122. Exemption for certain agricultural buildings
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Agricultural or horticultural use" includes the activities of raising, breeding and
boarding livestock and in connection with commercial horse boarding operations.
B. "Commercial horse boarding operation" means an agricultural enterprise consisting
of at least 7 acres and boarding at least 10 horses, regardless of ownership, that receives
$10,000 or more in gross receipts annually from fees generated through the boarding
of horses; through the production for sale of crops, livestock and livestock products; or
through both such boarding and such production. "Commercial horse boarding
operation" does not include operations whose primary on-site function is horse racing.
C. "Lands actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use" means lands not less
than 5 acres actually used in bona fide agricultural and horticultural production and
operation carried on for profit.
D. "Structure or building" includes:
(1) A permanent or impermanent structure, including, but not limited to, a trellis
or pergola, made of metal or wood or a permanent or impermanent building,
including a greenhouse, or portion of such a structure or building used directly and
exclusively in the raising and production for sale of agricultural and horticultural
commodities or necessary for the storage of such commodities;
(2) A structure or building used to provide housing for regular and essential
employees and their immediate families who are primarily employed in connection
with the operation of lands actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use, but
not a structure or building occupied as a residence by an applicant and the
applicant's immediate family under subsection 3;
(3) A structure or building used as an indoor exercise arena exclusively for training
and exercising horses in connection with the raising and production for sale of
agricultural and horticultural commodities or in connection with a commercial
horse boarding operation;
(4) A structure or building used in the production of maple syrup; and
Page 3 - 132LR2233(01)

(5) A structure or building used in the production of honey, royal jelly, bee pollen,
propolis and beeswax, including a structure or building used for the storage of bees.
"Structure or building" does not include a structure or building used in the sale of maple
syrup, honey or beeswax; a riding academy; or a dude ranch.
2. Exemption allowed for certain agricultural buildings. For property tax years
beginning on or after April 1, 2026, a taxpayer is allowed an exemption from the tax
imposed under this Part equal to any increase in the value of a structure or building essential
to the operation of lands actively devoted to agricultural or horticultural use and actually
used and occupied to carry out that operation that are constructed or reconstructed after
January 1, 2026. An exemption under this subsection continues only while the structure or
building is actually used and occupied as provided in this subsection, but in no event for
more than 10 years.
3. Application. A tax exemption may be granted only upon an application by the
owner of a structure or building described in subsection 2 on a form prescribed by the
bureau. The applicant shall furnish information as the bureau may require. An application
must be filed with the assessor on or before April 1st within one year from the date of
completion of the construction or reconstruction of the structure or building.
If the assessor is satisfied that the applicant is entitled to an exemption pursuant to this
section, the assessor shall approve the application.
4. Penalty. If the land or a structure or building in agricultural or horticultural use is
converted to a use other than an agricultural or horticultural use during the period of an
exemption under this section, the structure or building for which the exemption under this
section was granted is subject to taxation for the increase in the value of that structure or
building for the period of the exemption. The amount must be determined by the assessor
by applying the applicable tax rate for each prior year of the period of exemption to the
assessed valuation for that structure or building for each of those years. This amount of tax
must be levied and collected in the same manner and at the same time as other property
taxes are levied and collected in the municipality.
5. Rules. The bureau may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
PART C
Sec. C-1. Commissioner of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry to
study barriers to financial assistance programs. The Commissioner of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry shall direct staff of the Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry, Bureau of Agriculture, Food and Rural Resources to study the bureau's
financial assistance programs for farmers and food producers to identify and eliminate
barriers to accessing these programs and increase the effectiveness of these programs in
addressing farmer and food producer needs. The study must include an examination of the
consolidation of the various grant programs within the department and whether
consolidation of these programs into one office would reduce barriers to applicants or
create efficiencies within the grant programs. The study must examine the creation of a
single common application for all of the department's financial assistance programs, how
such an application could be actualized and whether efficiency would be found in the
Page 4 - 132LR2233(01)

415 consolidation of the application processes. The study must include at least 2 listening
426 sessions with farmers or food producers. These listening sessions must encompass topics
437 related to the study, including, but not limited to, the following:
l. Program application materials, submission procedures and timelines for application
retention by the department;
2. Contact procedures to inform applicants of new program opportunities;
3. Accessibility for beginning and emerging farmers and food producers, the expansion
of education about department programs, partnerships with community organizations to
reach new groups of farmers and food producers and identification of farmers and food
producers who currently underuse department programs; and
4. Input on how the department can organize and consolidate its financial assistance
offerings.
Sec. C-2. Report. By January 15, 2027, the Commissioner of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry shall submit a report detailing the results of the study under
section 1 and any recommended legislation to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over agriculture, conservation and forestry matters, which
may recommend legislation to the 133rd Legislature in 2027.